Hawaii, session 2026, SB3099.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the emergency and budget reserve fund, established by section 328L-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, serves as a fiscal safeguard to support essential government functions during economic downturns, revenue shortfalls, or emergencies.  Pursuant to section 328L-3(c), Hawaii Revised Statutes, the governor, through an appropriations bill, may recommend expenditures from the fund that meet the statutory purposes of the fund while providing reasons justifying the necessity for the appropriations.  Pursuant to section 328L-3(d), Hawaii Revised Statutes, the legislature may make appropriations from the fund for four allowable statutory purposes and must approve the appropriations bill by a two-thirds vote of both houses. The legislature further finds that, in fiscal year 2026-2027, the State faces continuing fiscal pressures arising from emergencies, severe economic downturn, and unforeseen reductions in revenue.  The State faces increased costs associated with maintaining levels of programs essential to public health, safety, welfare, and education, public services, providing counter cyclical economic and employment programs in periods of economic downturn, restoring facilities destroyed or damaged or services disrupted by disaster, and meeting other emergencies declared by the governor, or as determined to be urgent by the legislature. The legislature finds that appropriations from the emergency and budget reserve fund are needed to meet the conditions of emergency, economic downturn, and unforeseen reductions in revenues that the State will face.  Further, the legislature finds that the appropriations in this Act are consistent with the purposes of the emergency and budget reserve fund. The purpose of this Act is to appropriate moneys from the emergency and budget reserve fund of the State of Hawaii for fiscal year 2026-2027 to maintain the levels of programs determined to be essential to education, public health, and public welfare, provide for counter cyclical economic and employment programs of economic downturn, restore facilities destroyed or damaged or services disrupted by disaster, and meet other emergencies declared by the governor or determined to be urgent by the legislature. SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the emergency and budget reserve fund the sum of $___________ or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for ______________. Although the specific conditions necessitating this expenditure are not fully known at this time, the appropriation is necessary to ensure the availability of funds to address emergencies or other urgent needs consistent with section 328L-3(d), Hawaii Revised Statutes, and to prevent the disruption of essential government functions. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the ____________ for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3. This Act, upon its approval, shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST